Florida, session 2026, SB570.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âSection 17.675, Florida Statutes, is created to 22 read: 23 17.675âTask Force on Payment Scams.â 24 (1)âThe Task Force on Payment Scams, a task force as 25 defined in s. 20.03(5), is created adjunct to the Department of 26 Financial Services. Except as otherwise provided in this 27 section, the task force shall operate in a manner consistent 28 with s. 20.052. The department shall provide administrative and 29 staff support relating to the functions of the task force. 30 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 31 (a)ââPaymentâ means any mechanism through which an 32 individual can electronically transfer funds to another 33 individual via a platform or intermediary. 34 (b)ââTask forceâ means the Task Force on Payment Scams 35 created under this section. 36 (3)âNo later than October 1, 2026, the Chief Financial 37 Officer shall establish the Task Force on Payment Scams. The 38 purpose of the task force is to recognize and avert payment 39 scams by doing all of the following: 40 (a)âExamining current trends and developments in payment 41 scams, identifying effective methods for preventing such scams, 42 and issuing recommendations to enhance efforts to identify and 43 prevent such activities. 44 (b)âAdopting a cross-sector approach to ensure the task 45 forceâs recommendations reflect the full scope of the issue, 46 given that scams impact individuals across a wide range of 47 industries, including financial services, telecommunications, 48 and technology. 49 (c)âIncluding representation from stakeholders with direct 50 experience supporting victims of scams, as well as industry 51 participants with insight into scam tactics and prevention 52 strategies. 53 (4)(a)âThe task force shall be chaired by the Chief 54 Financial Officer or his or her designee and task force members 55 shall include all of the following: 56 1.âThe Commissioner of Agriculture or his or her designee. 57 2.âThe Attorney General or his or her designee. 58 3.âA representative from the Division of Treasury of the 59 Department of Financial Services, appointed by the Chief 60 Financial Officer. 61 4.âThe Secretary of Commerce or his or her designee. 62 5.âA representative from the Financial Crime Analysis 63 Center of the Department of Law Enforcement, appointed by the 64 Chief Financial Officer. 65 6.âA representative from the Financial Transaction Database 66 of the Department of Law Enforcement, appointed by the Chief 67 Financial Officer. 68 7.âA representative from a financial institution who has 69 expertise in identifying, preventing, and combating payment 70 scams, appointed by the Chief Financial Officer in consultation 71 with the task force. 72 8.âA representative from a credit union who has expertise 73 in identifying, preventing, and combating payment scams, 74 appointed by the Chief Financial Officer in consultation with 75 the task force. 76 9.âA representative from a digital payment network who has 77 expertise in identifying, preventing, and combating payment 78 scams, appointed by the Chief Financial Officer in consultation 79 with the task force. 80 10.âA representative from a community bank, appointed by 81 the Chief Financial Officer in consultation with the task force. 82 11.âA representative from a consumer group, appointed by 83 the Chief Financial Officer in consultation with the task force. 84 12.âA representative from an industry association 85 representing technology or online platforms, appointed by the 86 Chief Financial Officer in consultation with the task force. 87 13.âNot more than five representatives appointed by the 88 Chief Financial Officer to represent scam victims, scam victim 89 support networks, and other relevant stakeholders in order to 90 better assist consumers and stakeholders. 91 (b)âMembers of the task force shall serve until the 92 termination of the task force. Any vacancy occurring in the 93 membership of the task force shall be filled in the same manner 94 in which the original appointment was made. 95 (c)âMembers of the task force: 96 1.âShall serve without compensation, except that employees 97 of this state shall receive the same salaries and benefits as 98 they would without serving on the task force. 99 2.âAre entitled to receive reimbursement for per diem and 100 travel expenses pursuant to s. 112.061. 101 (d)âThe task force shall meet at least three times during 102 the 1-year period beginning on October 1, 2026, and thereafter 103 at such times and places and by such means as the chair of the 104 task force determines to be appropriate, which may include the 105 use of communications media technology. 106 (5)âThe duties of the task force include all of the 107 following: 108 (a)âEvaluating best practices for combating scammer 109 methods, such as spoofed calls, scam text messages, and 110 malicious advertisements, pop-ups, and websites. 111 (b)âAssessing how other state, federal, and international 112 jurisdictions have tried to prevent payment scams. 113 (c)âIdentifying and reviewing current methods used to scam 114 a consumer through payment platforms. 115 (d)âDetermining a strategy for education programs that 116 better equip consumers to identify, avoid, and report payment 117 scam attempts to the appropriate authorities. 118 (e)âCoordinating efforts to ensure perpetrators of payment 119 scams can be identified and pursued by law enforcement. 120 (f)âConsulting with other relevant stakeholders, including 121 federal, state, local, and tribal agencies and financial 122 services providers. 123 (g)âDetermining whether any additional legislation would be 124 beneficial for law enforcement and industry in mitigating 125 payment scams. 126 (h)âIdentifying potential solutions to payment scams 127 involving business e-mail compromise. 128 (6)(a)âNo later than 1 year after the date on which the 129 task force is established, the task force shall submit to the 130 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 131 Representatives and make publicly available online a report 132 detailing all of the following: 133 1.âThe results of the reviews and evaluations of the task 134 force under subsection (5). 135 2.âThe strategy identified under subsection (5). 136 3.âAny legislative or regulatory recommendations described 137 in subsection (5) which would enhance the ability to detect and 138 prevent payment scams. 139 4.âRecommendations to enhance cooperation among federal, 140 state, local, and tribal authorities in the investigation and 141 prosecution of scams and other financial crimes, including 142 harmonizing data collection, improving reporting mechanisms and 143 channels, estimating the number of complaints and consumers 144 affected, and evaluating the effectiveness of anti-scam training 145 programs. 146 (b)âAfter submitting an initial report required under 147 paragraph (a), the task force shall submit annually to the 148 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 149 Representatives and make publicly available online an updated 150 version of the report. 151 (7)âIn accordance with s. 20.052(8), this section is 152 repealed October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 153 through reenactment by the Legislature. 154 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.